Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 2 Parties

9-2-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 240; G.L. 1909, ch. 283, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 333, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 518, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-2-1

; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 9, effective January 10, 1966 . For provisions governing such joinder in superior courts see Super. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rule 20(a).

9-2-2.
Joinder of defendants in action on contract or instrument.

When, in an action on any contract or specialty, including a bill of exchange or a promissory note, the property of a surety, endorser, or drawer has been attached, the property of the promissor, acceptor, or principal, properly before the court, if within its jurisdiction, if not attached at the commencement of the action, may be attached on mesne process or execution, and shall in all cases be first applied in the satisfaction of any judgment recovered therein.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 241; G.L. 1909, ch. 283, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 333, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 518, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-2-2

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 8; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 15.

9-2-3, 9-2-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, §§ 243, 244; G.L. 1909, ch. 283, §§ 23, 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 333, §§ 23, 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 518, §§ 3, 4; G.L. 1956, §§

9-2-3

, 9-2-4; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 9, effective January 10, 1966. For rule governing nonjoinder and misjoinder of parties in superior and district courts, see Super. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rules 19(b), 21.

9-2-5.
Proceedings unimpaired by changes in parties.

No change of parties made by order of the court shall impair any previous attachment of the estate or arrest of the body of any defendant remaining in the action, nor impair any bond or bail given by any party remaining, either as against himself or herself or his or her sureties. And in all the above cases, the writ shall be amended accordingly.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 245; G.L. 1909, ch. 283, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 333, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 518, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

9-2-5

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 8.

9-2-6.
Liability of representatives of deceased joint contractor.

Unless otherwise provided in the contract, upon the death of any joint contractor, his or her representatives may be charged in the same manner as such representatives might have been charged if the contract had been several instead of joint; provided, that the plaintiff shall first exhaust the partnership estate if the joint contract is a partnership contract.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 237; G.L. 1909, ch. 283, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 333, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 476, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-2-6

.

Partnership Estate.

Partnership debts become joint and several on the decease of one of the partners. Nathanson v. Spitz,

19 R.I. 70

, 31 A. 690,

1895 R.I. LEXIS 36

(1895).

In the suit involving notes, the representative of deceased partner cannot be charged for a partnership debt on which he was jointly liable till the plaintiff shall have first exhausted the partnership estate. National Exch. Bank v. Galvin,

20 R.I. 159

, 37 A. 811,

1897 R.I. LEXIS 77

(1897).

9-2-7.
Effect of judgment against part of joint contractors.

No judgment, without complete satisfaction, rendered against a part only of the defendants in any action upon a joint contract shall be a bar to any future action on the contract, for any unsatisfied balance due, against such of the defendants upon whom or whose estate the writ in the original action shall not have been served.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 238; G.L. 1909, ch. 283, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 333, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 476, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-2-7

.

9-2-8.
Assignee of nonnegotiable chose in action.

The assignee of a nonnegotiable chose in action which has been assigned in writing may maintain an action thereon in his or her own name, but subject to all defenses and rights of counterclaim, recoupment, or setoff to which the defendant would have been entitled had the action been brought in the name of the assignor.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 333, § 30, as enacted by P.L. 1938, ch. 2615, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 509, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-2-8

.

9-2-9.
Restricted liability on instrument signed as fiduciary.

Where an instrument contains, or a person adds to his or her signature, words indicating that he or she contracts or signs in his or her representative capacity as trustee, executor, administrator, guardian, or conservator, he or she shall not be personally liable on the instrument, if he or she was duly authorized to make the instrument in his or her representative capacity; should an action on the instrument be brought against the trustee, executor, administrator, guardian, or conservator in his or her representative capacity, or against his or her successor, an execution on any judgment obtained against him or her shall run only against the goods, chattels, and real estate of the estate in the hands and possession of the trustee, executor, administrator, guardian, or conservator, or his or her successor, and not against his or her own property and estate; provided, that upon a suggestion of waste as provided in §

33-9-28

, a civil action may be brought against him or her personally in the manner provided in §

33-9-28

, and the procedure shall be in conformity with § 33-9-28 and applicable procedural rules.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 208, § 24, as enacted by C.P.A. 1905, § 1147; G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 529, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-2-9

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 8; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 15.

9-2-10.
Association defined.

Any unincorporated organization of persons, except a partnership, is deemed an association within the meaning of §§

9-2-11

—

9-2-15

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1906, ch. 1348, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 30; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 530, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-2-10

.

9-2-11.
Actions by trustee for unincorporated associations.

Any action or other civil proceeding may be maintained by any officer or member of an unincorporated association as trustee in its behalf, if so authorized by the association, to recover any property or upon any cause of action for or upon which all the associates may maintain such action or proceeding by reason of their interest or ownership therein, either jointly or in common. Any action or other civil proceeding may likewise be maintained by such officer or member to recover from one or more members of the association his or her or their proportionate share of any money lawfully expended by the association for the benefit of the associates or to enforce any lawful claim of the association against the member or members.

History of Section.

P.L. 1906, ch. 1348, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 30; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 530, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-2-11

; P.L. 1966, ch. 1, § 5.

9-2-12.
Actions against unincorporated associations.

Any action or other civil proceeding may be maintained to recover any property or upon any cause of action for or upon which the plaintiff may maintain such an action or proceeding against all the associates, by reason of their interest or ownership, or claim of ownership therein, against the president and secretary of the association, or the officers or members exercising substantially the duties, respectively, of president and secretary, or if there is no such officer, or officers, or members exercising such duties, or either of them, then against any other two (2) officers of the association, or if there is but one officer, then against the single officer, or if there is no officer known to the plaintiff, then against any member of the association, describing the officer or officers, member or members, as the representative or representatives of the association.

History of Section.

P.L. 1906, ch. 1348, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 30, § 30; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 530, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-2-12

; P.L. 1966, ch. 1, § 5.

Parties to Suit.

An unincorporated association is not a proper party in a lawsuit under the law of Rhode Island. Walsh v. Israel Couture Post, No. 2274 V.F.W, 542 A.2d 1094,

1988 R.I. LEXIS 102

(R.I. 1988); Corrente v. Rhode Island, Dep't of Corrections, 759 F. Supp. 73, 1991 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 3644 (D.R.I. 1991).

9-2-13.
Death or incapacity of member or representative of association.

The death or legal incapacity of a member of the association shall not affect an action or other civil proceeding brought as provided in §§

9-2-11

and

9-2-12

. If either of the officers or persons by or against whom the action or other civil proceeding is brought dies, is removed, resigns, or becomes otherwise incapacitated during the pendency thereof, the court before which the action or proceeding is pending shall make an order directing the action or proceeding to be continued by or against his or her successor in office or by or against any other officer or member who might have been a party originally to the action or proceeding.

History of Section.

P.L. 1906, ch. 1348, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 31; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 31; G.L. 1938, ch. 530, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-2-13

; P.L. 1966, ch. 1, § 5; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 15.

9-2-14.
Judgment and execution against association.

In an action or proceeding brought pursuant to §§

9-2-11

and

9-2-12

, the officers or members against whom the action is brought shall not be arrested; and a judgment against them shall not authorize an execution to be issued against their property or person. When the judgment is for a sum of money, an execution issued thereon must require the officer serving the execution to satisfy the execution out of any personal or real property belonging to the association or owned jointly or in common by all members thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1906, ch. 1348, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 32; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 32; G.L. 1938, ch. 530, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

9-2-14

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 15.

9-2-15.
Actions against members prohibited pending action against association.

When any action or proceeding is brought to recover any property, or upon any cause of action for or upon which the plaintiff may maintain such an action or proceeding against all the associates by reason of their interest or ownership or claim of ownership therein as provided in §§

9-2-10

—

9-2-14

, no action or other civil proceeding for the same cause of action shall be brought to recover a personal judgment against the members of the association or any of them until after final judgment in the first action or proceeding and the return of any execution issued thereon wholly or partially unsatisfied.

History of Section.

P.L. 1906, ch. 1348, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 33; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 33; G.L. 1938, ch. 530, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

9-2-15

; P.L. 1966, ch. 1, § 5.

9-2-16.
Joinder of husband and wife as plaintiffs.

A husband and wife may join as parties plaintiffs in the same action to recover damages for negligence and shall be entitled to recover their respective damages in that action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 217, § 1.

9-2-17.
Joinder of registered owner and operator of motor vehicle as defendants in action for negligence.

A plaintiff may join the registered owner and operator of a motor vehicle in an action to recover damages for negligence. Nothing herein shall be deemed to deprive the owner or operator of any defense he or she may have.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 218, § 1.

9-2-18.
Acceleration of actions when party 65 or older.

Any civil action in which a plaintiff or a defendant has attained the age of sixty-five (65) years, and is not a corporation, partnership, association, or other such entity, shall be accelerated to trial at the request of the party. This section shall not be construed so as to preclude reasonable discovery.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 347, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 80, § 1.

9-2-18.1.
Acceleration of action for enforcement of mechanics’ lien.

Upon motion of any party in an action to enforce a mechanics’ lien, or in an action on a bond or cash escrow provided pursuant to §

34-28-17

, the court may grant that the hearing on the petition shall be given priority on the calendar.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 25, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 328, § 5.

9-2-19.
Malpractice actions.

Any civil action filed on or after January 1, 1987, for personal injury or wrongful death filed against a licensed physician, hospital, clinic, health maintenance organization, professional service corporation providing health care services, dentist, or dental hygienist based on professional negligence in which the parties agree that the damages, if liability is proven, are likely to be in the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more, or if the court upon motion by either party finds that the damages, if liability is proven, are likely to be in the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more, shall be given priority for expedited hearing. This section shall not be construed so as to preclude adequate time for reasonable discovery.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 350, § 10.

9-2-20.
Acceleration of actions involving $100,000 or more.

Any civil action filed for personal injury, property damage, or wrongful death in which the parties agree that the damages, if liability is proven, are likely to be in the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more, or if the court upon motion by either party finds that the damages, if liability is proven, are likely to be in the sum of one hundred thousand ($100,000) or more, shall be given priority for expedited hearing. This section shall not be construed so as to preclude adequate time for reasonable discovery.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 522, § 4.